Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-828.01
Wildland Fire Response Act, how cited.

Sections 81-828.01 to 81-828.07 shall be known and may be cited as the Wildland Fire Response Act.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 20.